Utah statutes.
20A-1-610.   Abetting violation of chapter -- Penalty.

In addition to the penalties established in Section 20A-1-609, any person who aids, abets, or advises a violation of any provision of this title is guilty of a class B misdemeanor, unless another penalty is specifically provided.



Enacted by Chapter 1, 1993 General Session

